Hawaii statutes.
[§128A-1] Policy and purpose. The
legislature finds that because of the existing and increasing possibility of
the occurrence of terrorist attacks of unprecedented size and destructiveness,
in order to ensure that the State will be adequately prepared to deal with such
attacks; preserve the lives and property of the people of the State; and
protect the public peace, health, and safety, it is necessary to:

(1) Provide for homeland security by the State and to
authorize the creation of organizations for homeland security in the counties
of the State; and

(2) Provide programs, in coordination with county
agencies, other state and federal agencies, and the private sector, to educate
and train publicly and privately employed workers and the general public to be
prepared for potential attacks.

The purpose of this chapter is to enact a
homeland security law to provide for all homeland security functions of this
State and its counties. [L 2013, c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next